vi: Trọng tâm nghiên cứu: Nhân chủng học; Sinh vật học; Hóa học; Khoa học máy tính; Kinh tế học; Khoa học môi trường; Địa lý; Lịch sử; Ngôn ngữ học; Văn học; Triết học; Vật lý; Khoa học chính trị; Tâm lý học; Xã hội học; Khác
hr-HR: Fokus istraživanja: Antropologija; Biologija; Kemija; Računalna znanost; Ekonomija; Znanost o okolišu; Geografija; Povijest; Lingvistika; Književnost; Filozofija; Fizika; Političke znanosti; Psihologija; Sociologija; Ostalo
pt-BR: Foco da pesquisa: Antropologia; Biologia; Química; Ciência da Computação; Economia; Ciência ambiental; Geografia; História; Linguística; Literatura; Filosofia; Física; Ciências Políticas; Psicologia; Sociologia; Outro
en: Research focus: Anthropology; Biology; Chemistry; Computer science; Economics; Environmental science; Geography; History; Linguistics; Literature; Philosophy; Physics; Political science; Psychology; Sociology; Other
hu: Kutatási célterület: Antropológia; Biológia; Kémia; Számítástechnika; Közgazdaságtan; Környezettudomány; Földrajz; Történelem; Nyelvészet; Irodalom; Filozófia; Fizika; Politológia; Pszichológia; Szociológia; Egyéb
de: Forschungsschwerpunkt: Anthropologie; Biologie; Chemie; Informatik; Wirtschaft; Umweltwissenschaft; Geographie; Geschichte; Linguistik; Literatur; Philosophie; Physik; Politikwissenschaft; Psychologie; Soziologie; Sonstiges
da: Forskningsfokus: Antropologi; Biologi; Kemi; Computervidenskab; Økonomi; Miljøvidenskab; Geografi; Historie; Lingvistik; Litteratur; Filosofi; Fysik; Statskundskab; Psykologi; Sociologi; Andet
zh-CN: 研究热点: 人类学; 生物学; 化学; 计算机科学; 经济学; 环境科学; 地理学; 历史; 语言学; 文学; 哲学; 物理; 政治学; 心理学; 社会学; 其他
pt-PT: Foco de pesquisa: Antropologia; Biologia; Química; Informática; Economia; Ciências ambientais; Geografia; História; Linguística; Literatura; Filosofia; Física; Ciências políticas; Psicologia; Sociologia; Outro
ko: 연구 초점: 인류학; 생물학; 화학; 컴퓨터 공학; 경제학; 환경 과학; 지리학; 역사; 언어학; 문학; 철학; 물리학; 정치학; 심리학; 사회학; 기타
fr: Axe de recherche: Anthropologie; Biologie; Chimie; Informatique; Économie; Sciences de l’environnement; Géographie; Histoire; Linguistique; Littérature; Philosophie; Physique; Sciences politiques; Psychologie; Sociologie; Autre
fi: Tutkimuksen painopiste: Antropologia; Biologia; Kemia; Tietojenkäsittelytiede; Taloustiede; Ympäristötiede; Maantiede; Historia; Kielitiede; Kirjallisuus; Filosofia; Fysiikka; Valtiotiede; Psykologia; Sosiologia; Muu
it: Focus della ricerca: Antropologia; Biologia; Chimica; Informatica; Economia; Scienza ambientale; Geografia; Storia; Linguistica; Letteratura; Filosofia; Dispositivi fisici; Scienze politiche; Psicologia; Sociologia; Altro
lt-LT: Tyrimo sritis: Antropologija; Biologija; Chemija; Informatika; Ekonomika; Gamtos mokslas; Geografija; Istorija; Lingvistika; Literatūra; Filosofija; Fizika; Politikos mokslas; Psichologija; Sociologija; Kita
zh-TW: 研究重點: 人類學; 生物學; 化學; 計算機科學; 經濟學; 環境科學; 地理; 記錄; 語言學; 文學; 哲學; 物理; 政治學; 心理學; 社會學; 其他
ja: 研究分野: 人類学; 生物学; 化学; コンピューターサイエンス; 経済学; 環境科学; 地理学; 歴史; 言語学; 文学; 哲学; 物理; 政治学; 心理学; 社会学; その他
ro-RO: Obiectivul cercetării: Antropologie; Biologie; Chimie; Informatică; Economie; Mediu; Geografie; Istorie; Lingvistică; Literatură; Filozofie; Fizică; Științe politice; Psihologie; Sociologie; Altele
nb: Forskningsfokus: Antropologi; Biologi; Kjemi; Datavitenskap; Økonomi; Miljø; Geografi; Historie; Lingvistikk; Litteratur; Filosofi; Fysikk; Politisk vitenskap; Psykologi; Sosiologi; Annen
es: Enfoque de investigación: Antropología; Biología; Química; Ciencias de la computación; Ciencias económicas; Ciencia medioambiental; Geografía; Historia; Lingüística; Literatura; Filosofía; Física; Ciencias políticas; Psicología; Sociología; Otros
sl-SI: Fokus raziskovanja: Antropologija; Biologija; Kemija; Računalništvo; Ekonomija; Okoljska znanost; Geografija; Zgodovina; Jezikoslovje; Literatura; Filozofija; Fizika; Politične vede; Psihologija; Sociologija; Drugo
cs: Zaměření výzkumu: Antropologie; Biologie; Chemie; Počítačová věda; Ekonomika; Věda o životním prostředí; Zeměpis; Historie; Lingvistika; Literatura; Filozofie; Fyzika; Politická věda; Psychologie; Sociologie; Jiné
tr: Araştırma odağı: Antropoloji; Biyoloji; Kimya; Bilgisayar bilimi; Ekonomi; Çevre bilimi; Coğrafya; Tarih; Dilbilim; Edebiyat; Felsefe; Fizik; Politika bilimi; Psikoloji; Sosyoloji; Diğer
sv: Forskningsfokus: Antropologi; Biologi; Kemi; Datavetenskap; Ekonomi; Miljövetenskap; Geografi; Historia; Lingvistik; Litteratur; Filosofi; Fysik; Statsvetenskap; Psykologi; Sociologi; Annat
th: มุ่งเน้นการวิจัย: มานุษยวิทยา; ชีววิทยา; เคมี; วิทยาการคอมพิวเตอร์; เศรษฐศาสตร์; วิทยาศาสตร์สิ่งแวดล้อม; ภูมิศาสตร์; ประวัติศาสตร์; ภาษาศาสตร์; วรรณกรรม; ปรัชญา; ฟิสิกส์; รัฐศาสตร์; จิตวิทยา; สังคมวิทยา; อื่นๆ
nl: Onderzoeksfocus: Antropologie; Biologie; Chemie; Computerwetenschappen; Economie; Milieuwetenschappen; Geografie; Geschiedenis; Taalkunde; Literatuur; Filosofie; Natuurkunde; Politieke wetenschappen; Psychologie; Sociologie; Andere
pl: Obszar badań: Antropologia; Biologia; Chemia; Informatyka; Ekonomia; Nauka o środowisku; Geografia; Historia; Językoznawstwo; Literatura; Filozofia; Fizyka; Politologia; Psychologia; Socjologia; Pozostałe
ru: Направление исследования: Антропология; Биология; Химия; Информатика; Экономика; Наука об окружающей среде; География; История; Лингвистика; Литература; Философия; Физика; Политология; Психология; Социология; Другое
el: Εστίαση της έρευνας: Ανθρωπολογία; Βιολογία; Χημεία; Πληροφορική; Οικονομικά; Περιβαλλοντική επιστήμη; Γεωγραφία; Ιστορία; Γλωσσολογία; Λογοτεχνία; Φιλοσοφία; Φυσική; Πολιτική επιστήμη; Ψυχολογία; Κοινωνιολογία; Άλλο
sk-SK: Zameranie výskumu: Antropológia; Biológia; Chémia; Informatika; Ekonomika; Environmentálna veda; Geografia; História; Jazykoveda; Literatúra; Filozofia; Fyzika; Politológia; Psychológia; Sociológia; Iné
bg-BG: Изследователски фокус: Антропология; Биология; Химия; Компютърни науки; Икономика; Наука за околната среда; География; История; Лингвистика; Литература; Философия; Физика; Политически науки; Психология; Социология; Други